Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,177
Tax refund setoff system; operation.

The tax refund setoff system shall allow the state government to offset a person's delinquent federal tax liability against any state tax refund due to such person. The delinquent tax liability shall include all tax liability, interest, penalties, fees, and any other charges accruing pursuant to the taxing laws of the federal government. This tax refund setoff system shall be in addition to and not a substitute for any other remedy available to collect such delinquencies.

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 4.